Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [256.4768] DISABILITY SERVICES TECHNOLOGY AND ADVOCACY EXPANSION GRANT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) A disability services technology and advocacy expansion grant is established to: new text end new text begin (1) support the expansion of assistive technology and remote support services for people with disabilities; and new text end new text begin (2) strengthen advocacy efforts for individuals with disabilities and the providers who serve individuals with disabilities. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner of human services must award the grant to an eligible grantee. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligible grantee. new text end new text begin An eligible grantee must: new text end new text begin (1) be a nonprofit organization with a statewide reach; new text end new text begin (2) have demonstrated knowledge of various forms of assistive technology and remote support for people with disabilities; and new text end new text begin (3) have proven capacity to provide education and training to multiple constituencies. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Allowable uses of grant funds. new text end new text begin Grant funds must be used to: new text end new text begin (1) develop and deliver comprehensive training programs for lead agencies, disability service providers, schools, employment support agencies, and individuals with disabilities and their families to ensure effective use of assistive technology and remote support tools. Training must address specific challenges faced by individuals with disabilities, such as accessibility, independence, and health monitoring; new text end new text begin (2) provide resources and support to advocacy organizations that work with individuals with disabilities and service providers. Resources and support must be used to promote the use of assistive technology to increase self-determination and community participation; new text end new text begin (3) maintain, distribute, and create accessible resources related to assistive technology and remote support. Materials must be tailored to address the unique needs of individuals with disabilities and the people and organizations who support individuals with disabilities; new text end new text begin (4) conduct research to explore new and emerging assistive technology solutions that address the evolving needs of individuals with disabilities. The research must emphasize the role of technology in promoting independence, improving quality of life, and ensuring safety; and new text end new text begin (5) conduct outreach initiatives to engage disability communities, service providers, and advocacy groups across Minnesota to promote awareness of assistive technology and remote support services. Outreach initiatives must focus on reaching underserved and rural populations. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Evaluation and reporting requirements. new text end new text begin (a) The grant recipient must submit an annual report by June 30 each year to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over disability services. The annual report must include: new text end new text begin (1) the number of individuals with disabilities and service providers who received training during the reporting year; new text end new text begin (2) data on the impact of assistive technology and remote support in improving quality of life, safety, and independence for individuals with disabilities; and new text end new text begin (3) recommendations for further advancing technology-driven disability advocacy efforts based on feedback and research findings. new text end new text begin (b) No later than three months after the grant period has ended, a final evaluation must be submitted to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over disability services to assess the overall impact on expanding access to assistive technology and remote support, with a focus on lessons learned and future opportunities for Minnesota's disability communities and service providers. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DISABILITY SERVICES TECHNOLOGY AND ADVOCACY EXPANSION GRANT.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for the purposes of the disability services technology and advocacy grant under Minnesota Statutes, section 256.4768. The general fund base appropriation for this purpose is set at $500,000 in fiscal year 2028, $500,000 in fiscal year 2029, $500,000 in fiscal year 2030, and $0 in fiscal year 2031. new text end